District of Columbia statutes.
47-107

Appropriations for contingent expenses — Expenditures.

All expenditures from appropriations made for contingent expenses of the District of Columbia shall be accounted for in the General Accounting Office as other expenditures for the District, and a detailed statement of such expenditures shall be reported to Congress in accordance with § 193 of the Revised Statutes of the United States (§ 492-2 of Title 31, United States Code ).

Feb. 25, 1885, 23 Stat. 319, ch. 145
July 18, 1888, 25 Stat. 314, ch. 676
June 10, 1921, 42 Stat. 24, ch. 18, § 304
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-107.
1973 Ed., § 47-107.
“§ 193 of the Revised Statutes of the United States ( § 492-2 of Title 31, United States Code),” referred to at the end of this section, was repealed by § 5(b) of Pub. L. 97-258, approved September 13, 1982.